Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-82] Rate of wages for laborers and
mechanics. The corporation shall require an eligible bidder or eligible
developer of a housing project developed under this subpart to comply with the
requirements of section 104-2 for those laborers and mechanics hired to work on
that housing project; provided that this section shall not apply to a housing
project developed under this chapter if the entire cost of the project is less
than $500,000 and the eligible bidder or eligible developer is a private nonprofit
organization. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next